Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-2252
Local long-term care ombudsman programs; designation; provisional status.

The office may designate for two-year periods, within each planning-and-service area designated pursuant to section 81-2213, local long-term care ombudsman programs.

The office may withdraw or provisionally maintain the designation of an entity as a local long-term care ombudsman program. If the designation of a local long-term care ombudsman program is provisionally maintained, the office shall notify the program of the reasons for the provisional status, of the changes or corrections necessary for the removal of the provisional status, of the length of time permitted to make the changes or corrections, and that the office will withdraw the designation if the program does not comply with the requirements specified in the notice. If the designation of a local long-term care ombudsman program is withdrawn, the office may provide for the continuation of long-term care ombudsman services for that area.

Laws 1992, LB 677, § 16;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 771;

Laws 2018, LB903, § 16.
April 12, 2018